Hawaii statutes.
[§353-134] Compliance by department;
no cause of action. The department shall ensure that the offender
information contained within the system is updated on a regular basis
sufficient to timely notify a victim or a concerned member of the community of
the offender's release, discharge, or escape. However, failure of the system
to provide notice to the victim or a concerned member of the community shall
not establish a separate cause of action by the victim or a concerned member of
the community against the State, any county, or any state or county agency,
officer, or employee. [L 2012, c 190, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next